Connecticut, session 2026, HB05031.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The following sums are appropriated
2 from the GENERAL FUND for the purposes herein specified for the
3 fiscal year ending June 30, 2026:
T1 GENERAL FUND 2025-2026
T2
T3 STATE COMPTROLLER
T4 Other Expenses 275,000
T5
T6 DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY SERVICES AND
PUBLIC PROTECTION
T7 Personal Services 5,775,000
T8
T9 DEPARTMENT OF LABOR
T10 Other Expenses 900,000
T11
T12 DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING
T13 Housing/Homeless Services 14,500,000
T14
LCO 1 of 9

Substitute Bill No. 5031
T15 DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HEALTH AND
ADDICTION SERVICES
T16 Personal Services 5,500,000
T17 Behavioral Health Medications 340,000
T18
T19 TECHNICAL EDUCATION AND CAREER SYSTEM
T20 Other Expenses 6,700,000
T21
T22 OFFICE OF EARLY CHILDHOOD
T23 Birth to Three 1,840,000
T24
T25 TEACHERS' RETIREMENT BOARD
T26 Retirement Contributions - UAL 150,000,000
T27
T28 DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTION
T29 Personal Services 4,000,000
T30 Other Expenses 7,430,000
T31 Inmate Medical Services 6,000,000
T32
T33 WORKERS' COMPENSATION CLAIMS -
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
T34 Workers' Compensation Claims 500,000
T35 Workers Comp Claims – DMHAS 7,000,000
T36 Workers Comp Claims – DESPP 1,250,000
T37 Workers Comp Claims – DOC 8,000,000
T38
T39 TOTAL - GENERAL FUND 220,010,000
4 Sec. 2. (Effective from passage) The amounts appropriated to the
5 following agencies in section 1 of public act 25-168, are reduced by the
6 following amounts for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026:
T40 GENERAL FUND 2025-2026
T41
T42 LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT
T43 Personal Services 1,000,000
LCO 2 of 9

Substitute Bill No. 5031
T44
T45 SECRETARY OF THE STATE
T46 Personal Services 600,000
T47
T48 ELECTIONS ENFORCEMENT COMMISSION
T49 Elections Enforcement Commission 350,000
T50
T51 DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE SERVICES
T52 Personal Services 2,500,000
T53
T54 OFFICE OF GOVERNMENTAL ACCOUNTABILITY
T55 Contracting Standards Board 100,000
T56 Office of the Child Advocate 215,000
T57 Office of the Correction Ombuds 300,000
T58 Office of the Educational Ombudsperson 180,000
T59
T60 OFFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT
T61 Personal Services 1,000,000
T62
T63 DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
T64 Personal Services 500,000
T65
T66 DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
T67 Personal Services 3,000,000
T68 State Insurance and Risk Mgmt Operations 4,500,000
T69 IT Services 1,000,000
T70
T71 ATTORNEY GENERAL
T72 Personal Services 3,000,000
T73
T74 DIVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE
T75 Personal Services 3,500,000
T76
T77 MILITARY DEPARTMENT
T78 Personal Services 275,000
T79 JEEP Program 169,000
T80
LCO 3 of 9

Substitute Bill No. 5031
T81 DEPARTMENT OF CONSUMER PROTECTION
T82 Personal Services 2,100,000
T83 Other Expenses 15,000
T84
T85 COMMISSION ON HUMAN RIGHTS AND
OPPORTUNITIES
T86 Personal Services 100,000
T87 Other Expenses 10,000
T88
T89 DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
T90 Personal Services 250,000
T91 Other Expenses 250,000
T92
T93 DEPARTMENT OF ENERGY AND ENVIRONMENTAL
PROTECTION
T94 Personal Services 50,000
T95 Other Expenses 35,000
T96 Emergency Spill Response 500,000
T97 U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission 96,000
T98
T99 DEPARTMENT OF ECONOMIC AND COMMUNITY
DEVELOPMENT
T100 Personal Services 200,000
T101 Other Expenses 1,000,000
T102
T103 DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH
T104 Public Health Response 468,858
T105
T106 OFFICE OF HEALTH STRATEGY
T107 Personal Services 200,000
T108
T109 DEPARTMENT OF DEVELOPMENTAL SERVICES
T110 Personal Services 500,000
T111 Behavioral Services Program 1,100,000
T112 Supplemental Payments for Medical Services 300,000
T113 Employment Opportunities and Day Services 632,035
T114
LCO 4 of 9

Substitute Bill No. 5031
T115 DEPARTMENT OF AGING AND DISABILITY
SERVICES
T116 Personal Services 100,000
T117 Other Expenses 50,000
T118 Employment Opportunities – Blind & Disabled 100,000
T119 Special Training for the Deaf Blind 50,000
T120
T121 DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION
T122 Personal Services 1,050,000
T123 Other Expenses 1,164,121
T124 Aspiring Educators Scholarship Program 2,000,000
T125 Charter Schools 1,000,000
T126 Open Choice Program 1,000,000
T127 Magnet Schools 2,500,000
T128
T129 OFFICE OF HIGHER EDUCATION
T130 Personal Services 100,000
T131 Other Expenses 357,976
T132 CT Loan Forgiveness 4,500,000
T133
T134 TEACHERS' RETIREMENT BOARD
T135 Personal Services 100,000
T136 Retirees Health Service Cost 200,000
T137 Municipal Retiree Health Insurance Costs 600,000
T138
T139 DEPARTMENT OF CHILDREN AND FAMILIES
T140 Child Abuse and Neglect Intervention 100,000
T141 Community Based Prevention Programs 100,000
T142 Family Violence Outreach and Counseling 50,000
T143 Family Preservation Services 50,000
T144 Substance Abuse Treatment 100,000
T145 Child Welfare Support Services 50,000
T146
T147 JUDICIAL DEPARTMENT
T148 Personal Services 1,796,640
T149
T150 PUBLIC DEFENDER SERVICES COMMISSION
LCO 5 of 9

Substitute Bill No. 5031
T151 Personal Services 940,000
T152 Assigned Counsel - Criminal 838,360
T153
T154 STATE COMPTROLLER - FRINGE BENEFITS
T155 Higher Education Alternative Retirement System 22,605,000
T156
T157 TOTAL - GENERAL FUND 71,497,990
7 Sec. 3. (Effective from passage) The following sums are appropriated
8 from the SPECIAL TRANSPORTATION FUND for the purposes herein
9 specified for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026:
T158 SPECIAL TRANSPORTATION FUND 2025-2026
T159
T160 STATE COMPTROLLER - FRINGE BENEFITS
T161 State Employees Health Service Cost 7,925,000
T162
T163 WORKERS' COMPENSATION CLAIMS -
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
T164 Workers' Compensation Claims 500,000
T165
T166 TOTAL - SPECIAL TRANSPORTATION FUND 8,425,000
10 Sec. 4. (Effective from passage) The amounts appropriated to the
11 following agencies in section 2 of public act 25-168, are reduced by the
12 following amounts for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026:
T167 S PECIAL TRANSPORTATION FUND 2025-2026
T168
T169 D EPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES
T170 P ersonal Services 400,000
T171
T172 D EPARTMENT OF MOTOR VEHICLES
T173 P ersonal Services 1,250,000
T174
LCO 6 of 9

Substitute Bill No. 5031
T175 T OTAL - SPECIAL TRANSPORTATION FUND 1,650,000
13 Sec. 5. (Effective from passage) The amounts appropriated to the
14 following agencies in section 4 of public act 25-168, are reduced by the
15 following amounts for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026:
T176 BANKING FUND 2025-2026
T177
T178 DEPARTMENT OF BANKING
T179 Personal Services 600,000
T180 Fringe Benefits 1,000,000
T181
T182 TOTAL - BANKING FUND 1,600,000
16 Sec. 6. (Effective from passage) The amounts appropriated to the
17 following agencies in section 5 of public act 25-168, are reduced by the
18 following amounts for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026:
T183 I NSURANCE FUND 2025-2026
T184
T185 O FFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT
T186 P ersonal Services 50,000
T187 F ringe Benefits 30,000
T188
T189 I NSURANCE DEPARTMENT
T190 P ersonal Services 250,000
T191
T192 O FFICE OF THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADVOCATE
T193 P ersonal Services 100,000
T194 F ringe Benefits 100,000
T195
T196 O FFICE OF HEALTH STRATEGY
T197 F ringe Benefits 150,000
T198
T199 T OTAL - INSURANCE FUND 680,000
LCO 7 of 9

Substitute Bill No. 5031
19 Sec. 7. (Effective from passage) The amounts appropriated to the
20 following agencies in section 6 of public act 25-168, are reduced by the
21 following amounts for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026:
T200 C ONSUMER COUNSEL AND PUBLIC UTILITY 2025-2026
CONTROL FUND
T201
T202 O FFICE OF POLICY AND MANAGEMENT
T203 P ersonal Services 35,000
T204 F ringe Benefits 35,000
T205
T206 O FFICE OF CONSUMER COUNSEL
T207 P ersonal Services 100,000
T208 F ringe Benefits 75,000
T209
T210 T OTAL - CONSUMER COUNSEL AND PUBLIC UTILITY 245,000
CONTROL FUND
22 Sec. 8. (Effective from passage) The amounts appropriated to the
23 following agencies in section 7 of public act 25-168, are reduced by the
24 following amounts for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026:
T211 W ORKERS' COMPENSATION FUND 2025-2026
T212
T213 D IVISION OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE
T214 P ersonal Services 49,100
T215 F ringe Benefits 149,100
T216
T217 W ORKERS' COMPENSATION COMMISSION
T218 P ersonal Services 150,000
T219 O ther Expenses 150,000
T220 F ringe Benefits 400,000
T221
T222 T OTAL - WORKERS' COMPENSATION FUND 898,200
LCO 8 of 9

Substitute Bill No. 5031
25 Sec. 9. (Effective from passage) The amounts appropriated to the
26 following agencies in section 11 of public act 25-168, are reduced by the
27 following amounts for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026:
T223 C ANNABIS REGULATORY FUND 2025-2026
T224
T225 D EPARTMENT OF REVENUE SERVICES
T226 P ersonal Services 400,000
T227
T228 D EPARTMENT OF CONSUMER PROTECTION
T229 P ersonal Services 150,000
T230
T231 T OTAL - CANNABIS REGULATORY FUND 550,000
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Sec. 2 from passage New section
Sec. 3 from passage New section
Sec. 4 from passage New section
Sec. 5 from passage New section
Sec. 6 from passage New section
Sec. 7 from passage New section
Sec. 8 from passage New section
Sec. 9 from passage New section
APP Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 9 of 9